Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201781-2,263
Inconsistencies; sections control.

If there is an inconsistency between sections 81-2,239 to 81-2,292 and any code adopted by reference, the requirements of the sections shall control.

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 32;

Laws 1997, LB 199, § 20;

Laws 2003, LB 250, § 7;

Laws 2017, LB134, § 6.
August 24, 2017